Alabama, session 2026rs, HB638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-5A-171, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-5A-171
Except when a special hazard exists that requires lower
speed for compliance with Section 32-5A-170, the limits
hereinafter specified or established as hereinafter authorized
shall be maximum lawful speeds, and no person shall drive a
vehicle at a speed in excess of the maximum limits.
Page 1

vehicle at a speed in excess of the maximum limits.
HB638 INTRODUCED
(1) No person shall operate a vehicle in excess of 30
miles per hour in any urban district.
(2)a. No person shall operate a motor vehicle in excess
of 35 miles per hour on any unpaved road. For purposes of this
chapter the term "unpaved road" shall mean any highway under
the jurisdiction of any county, the surface of which consists
of natural earth, mixed soil, stabilized soil, aggregate,
crushed sea shells, or similar materials without the use of
asphalt, cement, or similar binders.
b. No person shall operate a motor vehicle on any
county-maintained paved road in an unincorporated area of the
state at a speed in excess of 45 miles per hour unless a
different maximum speed is established under authority granted
in subdivision (6) or as provided in subdivision (7) subject
to the maximum rate of speed provided in subdivision (3).
(3) No person shall operate a motor vehicle on the
highways in this state, other than interstate highways or
highways having four or more traffic lanes, at a speed in
excess of 55 miles per hour at any time unless a different
maximum rate of speed is authorized by the Governor under
authority granted in subdivision (6) or as provided in
subdivision (7).
(4) No person shall operate a motor vehicle, on an
interstate highway within the State of Alabama, at a speed in
excess of 70 miles per hour or on any other highway having
four or more traffic lanes at a speed in excess of 65 miles
per hour, unless a different maximum rate of speed is
authorized by the Governor under authority granted in
Page 2

authorized by the Governor under authority granted in
HB638 INTRODUCED
subdivision (6) or as provided in subdivision (7).
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision, any
portion of Corridor X/I-22 which is open between the
Alabama/Mississippi state line and the Jefferson County line
shall be considered an interstate highway for the purpose of
the maximum speed limit on the highway.
(5) Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to
the contrary, no person shall operate a passenger vehicle,
motor truck, or passenger bus which carries or transports
explosives or flammable liquids, as defined in Section
32-1-1.1, or hazardous wastes, as defined in Section
22-30-3(5), in this state unless the vehicle, truck, or bus
prominently displays a current decal, plate, or placard which
is required by the rules or regulations of the DOT or the PSC
which indicates or warns that the vehicle, truck, or bus is
carrying or transporting the substances. No person shall
operate the vehicle, truck, or bus at a rate of speed greater
than 55 miles per hour at any time unless a different maximum
rate of speed is authorized by the Governor under authority
granted in subdivision (6) or as provided in subdivision (7).
(6) The Governor may prescribe the maximum rate of
speed whenever a different rate of speed is required by
federal law in order for Alabama to receive federal funds for
highway maintenance and construction.
(7) The maximum speed limits set forth in this section
may be altered as authorized in Sections 32-5A-172 and
32-5A-173.
(8) A law enforcement officer or a peace officer of any
Page 3

(8) A law enforcement officer or a peace officer of any
HB638 INTRODUCED
incorporated municipality or town which has less than 19,000
inhabitants according to the most recent federal decennial
census shall not enforce this section on any interstate
highway.
(9) Any speed limit set pursuant to this section shall
be enforced by any municipality or any law enforcement officer
of a municipality only within both the corporate limits of the
municipality and not within the police jurisdiction of the
municipality."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4